Washington statutes.
RCW 36.81.010

Resolution of intention and necessity.

The board may by original resolution entered upon its minutes declare its intention to establish any county road in the county and declare that it is a public necessity and direct the county road engineer to report upon such project.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.81.010. Prior: 1937 c 187 s 19; RRS s 6450-19.]